Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.347

Consent or refusal to release adoptee's identifying information—Desire to be contacted—Certified statement.

(1) An adopted person over the age of eighteen may file with the department of health a certified statement declaring any one or more of the following:

(a) The adoptee refuses to consent to the release of any identifying information to a biological parent, biological sibling, or other biological relative and does not wish to be contacted by a confidential intermediary except in the case of a medical emergency as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction;

(b) The adoptee consents to the release of any identifying information to a confidential intermediary appointed under RCW 26.33.343, a biological parent, biological sibling, or other biological relative;

(c) The adoptee desires to be contacted by his or her biological parents, biological siblings, other biological relatives, or a confidential intermediary appointed under RCW 26.33.343;

(d) The current name, address, and telephone number of the adoptee who desires to be contacted.

(2) The certified statement shall be filed with the department of health and placed with the adoptee's original birth certificate if the adoptee was born in this state, or in a separate registry file for reference purposes if the adoptee was born in another state or outside of the United States. When the statement includes a request for confidentiality or a refusal to consent to the disclosure of identifying information, a prominent notice stating substantially the following shall also be placed at the front of the file: "AT THE REQUEST OF THE ADOPTEE, ALL RECORDS AND IDENTIFYING INFORMATION RELATING TO THIS ADOPTION SHALL REMAIN CONFIDENTIAL AND SHALL NOT BE DISCLOSED OR RELEASED WITHOUT A COURT ORDER SO DIRECTING."

(3) An adopted person who files a certified statement under subsection (1) of this section may subsequently file another certified statement requesting to rescind or amend the prior certified statement.

[ 1996 c 243 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—1996 c 243: "The legislature finds that it is in the best interest of the people of the state of Washington to support the adoption process in a variety of ways, including protecting the privacy interests of adult adoptees when the confidential intermediary process is used." [ 1996 c 243 s 1.]